New York, session 2025-2026, A841.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 241 of the elder law is amended to 2 read as follows: 3 3. "Income" shall mean "household gross income" as defined in the real 4 property tax circuit breaker credit program, pursuant to subparagraph 5 [(C)] (c) of paragraph one of subsection (e) of section six hundred six 6 of the tax law, but only shall include the income of program applicants 7 and spouses and shall exclude the income of other members of the house- 8 hold; provided, however, that the commissioner of health may adopt poli- 9 cies to exclude from income certain non-recurring items that would act 10 to artificially inflate the availability of funds to meet current needs 11 including, but not limited to, a retiree's previous year's wages, and 12 non-recurring distributions from an individual retirement account. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01879-01-5